apertium-sme-fin.fin.lexc
LEXICON kotus_56_VERB/stemfiller
0:{aä}	VerbStem/AInfinitive	;
0:{aä}	VerbStem/EInfinitive	;
0:{aä}	VerbStem/Present	;
0:{oö}	VerbStem/Past	;
0:{aä}	VerbStem/Potential	;
0:{aä}	VerbStem/Imperative	;
0:{aä}	VerbStem/Conditional	;
0:et	VerbStem/ParticiplePassive	;
0:et	VerbStem/Passive	;
0:et	VerbAllomorph/NUTPassiveParticiple/C	;

LEXICON kotus_57F_VERB/stemfiller
0:{t~~}{aä}{F}	VerbStem/AInfinitive	;
0:{t~~}{aä}{F}	VerbStem/EInfinitive	;
0:{t~~}{aä}{F}	VerbStem/Present	;
0:s	VerbStem/Past	;
0:{t~~}{oö}{F}	VerbStem/Past	;
0:{t~~}{aä}{F}	VerbStem/Potential	;
0:{t~~}{aä}{F}	VerbStem/Imperative	;
0:{t~~}{aä}{F}	VerbStem/Conditional	;
0:{t~~}et{F}	VerbStem/ParticiplePassive	;
0:{t~~}et{F}	VerbStem/Passive	;
0:{t~~}et{F}	VerbAllomorph/NUTPassiveParticiple/C	;

LEXICON kotus_57K_VERB/stemfiller
0:{t~~}{aä}{K}	VerbStem/AInfinitive	;
0:{t~~}{aä}{K}	VerbStem/EInfinitive	;
0:{t~~}{aä}{K}	VerbStem/Present	;
0:s	VerbStem/Past	;
0:{t~~}{oö}{K}	VerbStem/Past	;
0:{t~~}{aä}{K}	VerbStem/Potential	;
0:{t~~}{aä}{K}	VerbStem/Imperative	;
0:{t~~}{aä}{K}	VerbStem/Conditional	;
0:{t~~}et{K}	VerbStem/ParticiplePassive	;
0:{t~~}et{K}	VerbStem/Passive	;
0:{t~~}et{K}	VerbAllomorph/NUTPassiveParticiple/C	;

LEXICON kotus_58_VERB/stemfiller
0:e	VerbStem/AInfinitive	;
0:i	VerbStem/EInfinitive	;
0:e	VerbStem/Present	;
	VerbStem/Past	;
0:e	VerbStem/Potential	;
0:e	VerbStem/Imperative	;
	VerbStem/Conditional	;
0:et	VerbStem/ParticiplePassive	;
0:et	VerbStem/Passive	;
0:et	VerbAllomorph/NUTPassiveParticiple/C	;

LEXICON kotus_59_VERB/stemfiller
0:{t~~}e{J}	VerbStem/AInfinitive	;
0:{t~~}i{J}	VerbStem/EInfinitive	;
0:{t~~}e{J}	VerbStem/Present	;
0:s	VerbStem/Past	;
0:{t~~}e{J}	VerbStem/Potential	;
0:{t~~}e{J}	VerbStem/Imperative	;
0:t	VerbStem/Conditional	;
0:{t~~}et{J}	VerbStem/ParticiplePassive	;
0:{t~~}et{J}	VerbStem/Passive	;
0:{t~~}et{J}	VerbAllomorph/NUTPassiveParticiple/C	;

LEXICON kotus_60_VERB/stemfiller
0:h{t~~}e{F}	VerbStem/AInfinitive	;
0:h{t~~}i{F}	VerbStem/EInfinitive	;
0:h{t~~}e{F}	VerbStem/Present	;
0:h{t~~}{F}	VerbStem/Past	;
0:ks	VerbStem/Past	;
0:ksi	VerbStem/EInfinitive	;
0:h{t~~}e{F}	VerbStem/Potential	;
0:h{t~~}e{F}	VerbStem/Imperative	;
0:h{t~~}{F}	VerbStem/Conditional	;
0:h{t~~}e{F}t	VerbStem/ParticiplePassive	;
0:h{t~~}e{F}t	VerbStem/Passive	;
0:h{t~~}et{F}	VerbAllomorph/NUTPassiveParticiple/C	;

LEXICON kotus_61_VERB/stemfiller
0:i	VerbStem/AInfinitive	;
0:i	VerbStem/EInfinitive	;
0:i	VerbStem/Present	;
	VerbStem/Past	;
0:i	VerbStem/Potential	;
0:i	VerbStem/Imperative	;
	VerbStem/Conditional	;
0:it	VerbStem/ParticiplePassive	;
0:it	VerbStem/Passive	;
0:it	VerbAllomorph/NUTPassiveParticiple/C	;

LEXICON kotus_62_VERB/stemfiller
0:id{BVL}	VerbStem/AInfinitive	;
0:id{BVL}	VerbStem/EInfinitive	;
0:i{BVL}	VerbStem/Present	;
0:{BVL}	VerbStem/Past	;
0:i{BVL}	VerbStem/Potential	;
0:i{BVL}	VerbStem/Imperative	;
0:{BVL}	VerbStem/Conditional	;
0:id{BVL}	VerbStem/ParticiplePassive	;
0:i{BVL}	VerbStem/Passive	;
0:i{BVL}	VerbAllomorph/NUTPassiveParticiple/F	;

LEXICON kotus_63_VERB/stemfiller
0:{aeiouyäö}d{BVL}	VerbStem/AInfinitive	;
0:{aeiouyäö}d{BVL}	VerbStem/EInfinitive	;
0:{aeiouyäö}{BVL}	VerbStem/Present	;
0:{BVL}	VerbStem/Past	;
0:{aeiouyäö}{BVL}	VerbStem/Potential	;
0:{aeiouyäö}{BVL}	VerbStem/Imperative	;
0:{BVL}	VerbStem/Conditional	;
0:{aeiouyäö}d{BVL}	VerbStem/ParticiplePassive	;
0:{aeiouyäö}{BVL}	VerbStem/Passive	;
0:{aeiouyäö}{BVL}	VerbAllomorph/NUTPassiveParticiple/F	;

LEXICON kotus_64uo_VERB/stemfiller
0:uod{BVL}	VerbStem/AInfinitive	;
0:uod{BVL}	VerbStem/EInfinitive	;
0:uo{BVL}	VerbStem/Present	;
0:o{BVL}	VerbStem/Past	;
0:uo{BVL}	VerbStem/Potential	;
0:uo{BVL}	VerbStem/Imperative	;
0:o{BVL}	VerbStem/Conditional	;
0:uod{BVL}	VerbStem/ParticiplePassive	;
0:uo{BVL}	VerbStem/Passive	;
0:uo{BVL}	VerbAllomorph/NUTPassiveParticiple/F	;

LEXICON kotus_64yö_VERB/stemfiller
0:yöd{BVL}	VerbStem/AInfinitive	;
0:yöd{BVL}	VerbStem/EInfinitive	;
0:yö{BVL}	VerbStem/Present	;
0:ö{BVL}	VerbStem/Past	;
0:yö{BVL}	VerbStem/Potential	;
0:yö{BVL}	VerbStem/Imperative	;
0:ö{BVL}	VerbStem/Conditional	;
0:yöd{BVL}	VerbStem/ParticiplePassive	;
0:yö{BVL}	VerbStem/Passive	;
0:yö{BVL}	VerbAllomorph/NUTPassiveParticiple/F	;

LEXICON kotus_64ie_VERB/stemfiller
0:ied{BVL}	VerbStem/AInfinitive	;
0:ied{BVL}	VerbStem/EInfinitive	;
0:ie{BVL}	VerbStem/Present	;
0:e{BVL}	VerbStem/Past	;
0:ie{BVL}	VerbStem/Potential	;
0:ie{BVL}	VerbStem/Imperative	;
0:e{BVL}	VerbStem/Conditional	;
0:ied{BVL}	VerbStem/ParticiplePassive	;
0:ie{BVL}	VerbStem/Passive	;
0:ie{BVL}	VerbAllomorph/NUTPassiveParticiple/F	;

LEXICON kotus_65_VERB/stemfiller
0:yd{BVL}	VerbStem/AInfinitive	;
0:yd{BVL}	VerbStem/EInfinitive	;
0:y{BVL}	VerbStem/Present	;
0:v{BVL}	VerbStem/Past	;
0:y{BVL}	VerbStem/Potential	;
0:y{BVL}	VerbStem/Imperative	;
0:v{BVL}	VerbStem/Conditional	;
0:yd{BVL}	VerbStem/ParticiplePassive	;
0:y{BVL}	VerbStem/Passive	;
0:y{BVL}	VerbAllomorph/NUTPassiveParticiple/F	;

LEXICON kotus_66_VERB/stemfiller
0:{AV-}t	VerbStem/AInfinitive	;
0:{AV-}t	VerbStem/EInfinitive	;
0:{AV+}e	VerbStem/Present	;
0:{AV+}	VerbStem/Past	;
0:{AV-}	VerbStem/Potential	;
0:{AV+}	VerbStem/Imperative	;
0:{AV+}	VerbStem/Conditional	;
0:{AV-}t	VerbStem/ParticiplePassive	;
0:{AV-}	VerbStem/Passive	;
0:{AV-}	VerbAllomorph/NUTPassiveParticiple	;

LEXICON kotus_67_VERB/stemfiller
0:{AV-}{nlrs}	VerbStem/AInfinitive	;
0:{AV-}{nlrs}	VerbStem/EInfinitive	;
0:{AV+}e	VerbStem/Present	;
0:{AV+}	VerbStem/Past	;
0:{AV-}	VerbStem/Potential	;
0:{AV-}	VerbStem/Imperative	;
0:{AV+}	VerbStem/Conditional	;
0:{AV-}{nlrs}	VerbStem/ParticiplePassive	;
0:{AV-}	VerbStem/Passive	;
0:{AV-}	VerbAllomorph/NUTPassiveParticiple/I	;


LEXICON kotus_68_VERB/stemfiller
0:id	VerbStem/AInfinitive	;
0:id	VerbStem/EInfinitive	;
0:i	VerbStem/Present	;
0:itse	VerbStem/Present	;
	VerbStem/Past	;
0:its	VerbStem/Past	;
0:i	VerbStem/Potential	;
	VerbStem/Conditional	;
0:i	VerbStem/Imperative	;
0:its	VerbStem/Conditional	;
0:id	VerbStem/ParticiplePassive	;
0:i	VerbStem/Passive	;
0:i	VerbAllomorph/NUTPassiveParticiple/F	;

LEXICON kotus_69_VERB/stemfiller
0:t	VerbStem/AInfinitive	;
0:t	VerbStem/EInfinitive	;
0:tse	VerbStem/Present	;
0:ts	VerbStem/Past	;
0:n	VerbStem/Potential	;
0:t	VerbStem/Imperative	;
0:ts	VerbStem/Conditional	;
0:t	VerbStem/ParticiplePassive	;
0:t	VerbStem/Passive	;
0:t	VerbAllomorph/NUTPassiveParticiple/C	;

LEXICON kotus_70_VERB/stemfiller
0:st	VerbStem/AInfinitive	;
0:st	VerbStem/EInfinitive	;
0:kse	VerbStem/Present	;
0:ks	VerbStem/Past	;
0:s	VerbStem/Potential	;
0:s	VerbStem/Imperative	;
0:ks	VerbStem/Conditional	;
0:st	VerbStem/ParticiplePassive	;
0:s	VerbStem/Passive	;
0:s	VerbAllomorph/NUTPassiveParticiple	;

LEXICON kotus_71_VERB/stemfiller
0:hd	VerbStem/AInfinitive	;
0:hd	VerbStem/EInfinitive	;
0:{k~~}e{D}	VerbStem/Present	;
0:{k~~}{D}	VerbStem/Past	;
0:h	VerbStem/Potential	;
0:h	VerbStem/Imperative	;
0:{k~~}{D}	VerbStem/Conditional	;
0:hd	VerbStem/ParticiplePassive	;
0:h	VerbStem/Passive	;
0:h	VerbAllomorph/NUTPassiveParticiple/F	;

LEXICON kotus_72_VERB/stemfiller
0:{AV-}t	VerbStem/AInfinitive	;
0:{AV-}t	VerbStem/EInfinitive	;
0:{AV+}ne	VerbStem/Present	;
0:{AV+}n	VerbStem/Past	;
0:{AV-}n	VerbStem/Potential	;
0:{AV-}t	VerbStem/Imperative	;
0:{AV+}n	VerbStem/Conditional	;
0:{AV-}t	VerbStem/ParticiplePassive	;
0:{AV-}t	VerbStem/Passive	;
0:{AV-}t	VerbAllomorph/NUTPassiveParticiple/C	;

LEXICON kotus_73_VERB/stemfiller
0:{AV-}t{BVL}	VerbStem/AInfinitive	;
0:{AV-}t{BVL}	VerbStem/EInfinitive	;
0:{AV+}{aeiouyäö}{BVL}	VerbStem/Present	;
0:{AV+}s{BVL}	VerbStem/Past	;
0:{AV-}n{BVL}	VerbStem/Potential	;
0:{AV-}t{BVL}	VerbStem/Imperative	;
0:{AV+}{BVL}	VerbStem/Conditional	;
0:{AV-}t{BVL}	VerbStem/ParticiplePassive	;
0:{AV-}t{BVL}	VerbStem/Passive	;
0:{AV-}t{BVL}	VerbAllomorph/NUTPassiveParticiple/C	;

LEXICON kotus_67_VERB/stub
ajella'][POS=VERB][KTN=67]:ajel{^back}	kotus_67_VERB/stemfiller	;
arvella'][POS=VERB][KTN=67]:arvel{^back}	kotus_67_VERB/stemfiller	;
hikoilla'][POS=VERB][KTN=67]:hikoil{^back}	kotus_67_VERB/stemfiller	;
hymyillä'][POS=VERB][KTN=67]:hymyil{^front}	kotus_67_VERB/stemfiller	;
kastella'][POS=VERB][KTN=67]:kastel{^back}	kotus_67_VERB/stemfiller	;
katsella'][POS=VERB][KTN=67]:katsel{^back}	kotus_67_VERB/stemfiller	;
keskustella'][POS=VERB][KTN=67]:keskustel{^back}	kotus_67_VERB/stemfiller	;
kokeilla'][POS=VERB][KTN=67]:kokeil{^back}	kotus_67_VERB/stemfiller	;
kuljeskella'][POS=VERB][KTN=67]:kuljeskel{^back}	kotus_67_VERB/stemfiller	;
kuolla'][POS=VERB][KTN=67]:kuol{^back}	kotus_67_VERB/stemfiller	;
kysellä'][POS=VERB][KTN=67]:kysel{^front}	kotus_67_VERB/stemfiller	;
kävellä'][POS=VERB][KTN=67]:kävel{^front}	kotus_67_VERB/stemfiller	;
mennä'][POS=VERB][KTN=67]:men{^front}	kotus_67_VERB/stemfiller	;
panna'][POS=VERB][KTN=67]:pan{^back}	kotus_67_VERB/stemfiller	;
piileskellä'][POS=VERB][KTN=67]:piileskel{^front}	kotus_67_VERB/stemfiller	;
pilailla'][POS=VERB][KTN=67]:pilail{^back}	kotus_67_VERB/stemfiller	;
pyöräillä'][POS=VERB][KTN=67]:pyöräil{^front}	kotus_67_VERB/stemfiller	;
tulla'][POS=VERB][KTN=67]:tul{^back}	kotus_67_VERB/stemfiller	;
turmella'][POS=VERB][KTN=67]:turmel{^back}	kotus_67_VERB/stemfiller	;
varjella'][POS=VERB][KTN=67]:varjel{^back}	kotus_67_VERB/stemfiller	;
vierailla'][POS=VERB][KTN=67]:vierail{^back}	kotus_67_VERB/stemfiller	;
viljellä'][POS=VERB][KTN=67]:viljel{^front}	kotus_67_VERB/stemfiller	;
tapella'][POS=VERB][KTN=67][KAV=B]:tap{p~~}el{^back}{B}	kotus_67_VERB/stemfiller	;
ajatella'][POS=VERB][KTN=67][KAV=C]:ajat{t~~}el{^back}{C}	kotus_67_VERB/stemfiller	;
harjoitella'][POS=VERB][KTN=67][KAV=C]:harjoit{t~~}el{^back}{C}	kotus_67_VERB/stemfiller	;
ihmetellä'][POS=VERB][KTN=67][KAV=C]:ihmet{t~~}el{^front}{C}	kotus_67_VERB/stemfiller	;
jutella'][POS=VERB][KTN=67][KAV=C]:jut{t~~}el{^back}{C}	kotus_67_VERB/stemfiller	;
kaupitella'][POS=VERB][KTN=67][KAV=C]:kaupit{t~~}el{^back}{C}	kotus_67_VERB/stemfiller	;
käsitellä'][POS=VERB][KTN=67][KAV=C]:käsit{t~~}el{^front}{C}	kotus_67_VERB/stemfiller	;
lasketella'][POS=VERB][KTN=67][KAV=C]:lasket{t~~}el{^back}{C}	kotus_67_VERB/stemfiller	;
näytellä'][POS=VERB][KTN=67][KAV=C]:näyt{t~~}el{^front}{C}	kotus_67_VERB/stemfiller	;
taitella'][POS=VERB][KTN=67][KAV=C]:tait{t~~}el{^back}{C}	kotus_67_VERB/stemfiller	;
huuhdella'][POS=VERB][KTN=67][KAV=F]:huuh{t~~}el{^back}{F}	kotus_67_VERB/stemfiller	;
madella'][POS=VERB][KTN=67][KAV=F]:ma{t~~}el{^back}{F}	kotus_67_VERB/stemfiller	;
suudella'][POS=VERB][KTN=67][KAV=F]:suu{t~~}el{^back}{F}	kotus_67_VERB/stemfiller	;
valehdella'][POS=VERB][KTN=67][KAV=F]:valeh{t~~}el{^back}{F}	kotus_67_VERB/stemfiller	;
voidella'][POS=VERB][KTN=67][KAV=F]:voi{t~~}el{^back}{F}	kotus_67_VERB/stemfiller	;
ommella'][POS=VERB][KTN=67][KAV=H]:om{p~~}el{^back}{H}	kotus_67_VERB/stemfiller	;
kuunnella'][POS=VERB][KTN=67][KAV=J]:kuun{t~~}el{^back}{J}	kotus_67_VERB/stemfiller	;
työskennellä'][POS=VERB][KTN=67][KAV=J]:työsken{t~~}el{^front}{J}	kotus_67_VERB/stemfiller	;
